Nevada, session 83, AB354.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 327.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
327.120 The Board consists of:
1. [Twelve] Nine voting members, which include one
representative of each of the following agencies or organizations:
(a) Bureau of Mines and Geology of the State of Nevada.
(b) Faculty of the University of Nevada, Reno.
(c) Faculty of the University of Nevada, Las Vegas.
(d) Division of State Library, Archives and Public Records of
the Department of Administration.
(e) Department of Transportation of the State.
(f) State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.
(g) [Nevada Historical Society.] Division of Museums and
History of the Department of Tourism and Cultural Affairs.
(h) Department of Native American Affairs [.] of the State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(i) [United States Bureau of Land Management.
(j) United States Forest Service.
(k) United States National Park Service.
(l)] Inter-Tribal Council of Nevada, Inc., or its successor
organization.
 Each agency or organization shall designate a representative and
one alternative representative for this purpose.
2. Three nonvoting members who shall serve in an advisory
capacity to the Board, which include one representative of each of
the following agencies:
(a) United States Bureau of Land Management.
(b) United States Forest Service.
(c) United States National Park Service.
3. An Executive Secretary who is a nonvoting member of the
Board. The voting members of the Board shall select the Executive
Secretary.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of section
1 of this act, a person who, on July 1, 2025, is serving as a
representative of the Nevada State Board on Geographic Names
from the Nevada Historical Society may continue to serve in that
capacity until his or her successor is designated by the appropriate
agency pursuant to NRS 327.120, as amended by section 1 of this
act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)